Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-559
Local application, defined.

Local application means a computer program intended for use at the local government or state agency level, not of intergovernmental use, serving only limited local needs and proposed to be resident on only a limited part of the system.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 329.